North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 62A. Wine and Grape Growers Council.

§ 106-755.1.
North Carolina Wine and Grape Growers Council — Creation; powers and duties.

There is created the North Carolina Wine and Grape Growers Council of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The North Carolina Wine and Grape Growers Council shall have the following powers and duties:

To identify and implement methods for improving North Carolina’s rank as a wine-producing State;

To assure orderly growth and development of North Carolina’s grape and wine industry;

To achieve public awareness of the quality of North Carolina grapes and wine;

To coordinate the interaction of North Carolina’s grape and wine industry with other segments of the State’s economy such as tourism, retail trade, and horticulture;

To conduct methods of quality assurance of North Carolina’s grape and wine industry to create a sound foundation for further growth;

To assist in the coordination of the activities of the various State agencies and other organizations contributing to the development of the grape and wine industry;

To receive and disburse funds;

To enter into contracts for the purpose of developing new or improved markets or marketing methods for wine and grape products;

To contract for research services to improve viticultural and enological practices in North Carolina;

To enter into agreements with any local, state, or national organizations or agency engaged in education for the purpose of disseminating information on wine or other viticultural projects;

To enter into contracts with commercial entities for the purpose of developing marketing, advertising, and other promotional programs designed to promote the orderly growth of the North Carolina grape and wine industry;

To acquire any licenses or permits necessary for performance of the duties of the Council; and

To develop a State Viticulture Plan that identifies problems and constraints of the viticultural industry, proposes solutions to those problems and delineates planning mechanisms for the orderly growth of the industry.

By September 1 of each year, to report to the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources, the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, and the Fiscal Research Division on the activities of the Council, the status of the wine and grape industry in North Carolina and the United States, progress on the development and implementation of the State Viticulture Plan, and any contracts or agreements entered into by the Council for research, education, or marketing.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 974, s. 1; 1997-261, s. 109; 2005-380, s. 4(a); 2006-264, s. 98.3; 2010-31, s. 14.10; 2011-145, s. 14.3B; 2011-391, s. 38.1(b); 2012-142, s. 13.9A(b); 2020-78, s. 5.1(e).

§ 106-755.2.
North Carolina Wine and Grape Growers Council — Composition; terms; reimbursement.

The North Carolina Wine and Grape Growers Council shall consist of 10 members who shall be appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture as provided in this section. The members of the Council shall be divided into an advisory committee for the Vinifera Group and an advisory committee for the Muscadines Group for the purpose of performing the powers and duties prescribed in

G.S. 106-755.1

and for the purpose of promoting North Carolina wineries and tourism related to the wineries.

Each advisory committee shall consist of five members, who shall be appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture to serve two-year terms, which shall be staggered. The members appointed shall be chosen from among individuals who have education or experience in the wine industry or in the field of tourism. No member of an advisory committee may serve for more than two consecutive terms. Initial terms shall commence September 1, 2011.

Each advisory committee shall meet at least twice each calendar year during which time each committee shall discuss issues related to the Council’s powers and duties, including ways in which to promote and advertise North Carolina wineries and ways in which to improve, use, and distribute State maps showing winery locations. The Vinifera Group shall meet at the NC Shelton Badgett Viticulture Center at Surry Community College, and the Muscadines Group shall meet at Duplin Community College. After each meeting, each advisory committee shall report to the Commissioner of Agriculture with its recommendations. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, committee members shall receive no salary, per diem, subsistence, travel reimbursement, or other stipend or reimbursement as a result of serving on their respective committees.

Each advisory committee shall elect from the membership of each committee a chair and vice-chair. Vacancies resulting from the resignation of a member or otherwise shall be filled in the same manner in which the original appointment was made, and the term shall be for the balance of the unexpired term. A majority of the members of each committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The affirmative vote of a majority of the members present at meetings of each committee shall be necessary for action to be taken by the committee.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 974, s. 1; 1997-261, s. 109; 2005-380, s. 4(a); 2006-264, s. 98.3; 2011-145, s. 14.3B; 2011-391, s. 38.1(b), (c); 2012-142, s. 13.9A(b).

§§ 106-755.3 through 106-755.9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.